Massachusetts, session 194th, H2250.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the board of the
Whately Water District, established by chapter 433 of the acts of 1971, may convey any real
estate or interest in real estate owned or controlled by the district. The proceeds of such sale shall
be used to reimburse customers of the district previously served by the district’s well sources and
are now served by the town of Whately water department for the connection to such town
service.
SECTION 2. The Whately Water District and its board of water commissioners,
established by chapter 433 of the acts of 1971, are hereby dissolved. The tenure of all water
commissioners shall be terminated on the effective date of this section.
of 2

SECTION 3. Section 2 shall take effect upon the completion of the sale of all real estate
interests owned or controlled by the district and the distribution of the proceeds of such sale
pursuant to section 1.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2